Illinois, session 104th, HB3530.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly:  4    Section 5. The Illinois Food, Drug and Cosmetic Act is 5amended by changing Section 1 as follows: 6    (410 ILCS 620/1)  (from Ch. 56 1/2, par. 501)7    Sec. 1. This Act shall be known and and may be cited as the 8Illinois Food, Drug and Cosmetic Act.9(Source: Laws 1967, p. 959.)